Missouri, session 2026, HB2421.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 644, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 644.083, to read as follows:
644.083. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who has
contracted for the right to store water in a reservoir owned by the U.S. Army Corps of
Engineers shall have exclusive rights to any return flows generated directly or indirectly
to that reservoir by the person. The rights conferred by this section shall be subject to
any regulatory requirements imposed by this state and to the availability to the person
of unused storage capacity within the reservoir to store such return flows.
2. As used in this section, "return flow" means water that is discharged directly
or indirectly to a reservoir from a water reclamation facility.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.